Idaho, session 2026, S1319.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 67, Title 41, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 67
EMERGENCY CARE AFFORDABILITY ACT
41-6701. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Emergency Care Affordability Act."
41-6702. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature in
enacting this chapter to protect patients who are members of a health bene-
fit plan from high-cost emergency medical bills for care rendered in an out-
of-network freestanding emergency room or by out-of-network providers.
41-6703. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Allowed amount" means the amount determined by a health benefit
plan as payment in full for a covered emergency health care service or item
when furnished by an in-network provider or in-network facility of the same
or similar specialty or type in the same geographic area, including any ap-
plicable cost-sharing responsibility of the covered person, but excluding
billed charges or amounts determined by an out-of-network provider or facil-
ity.
(2) "Emergency medical condition" means a medical, mental health, or
substance use disorder condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of
sufficient severity, including but not limited to severe pain or emotional
distress, such that a prudent layperson who possesses an average knowledge
of health and medicine could reasonably expect the absence of immediate med-
ical, mental health, or substance use disorder treatment attention to result
in:
(a) A condition placing the health of the individual, or with respect to
a pregnant woman, the health of the woman or her unborn child, in serious
jeopardy;
(b) Serious impairment to bodily functions; or


(c) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.
(3) "Emergency services" means a medical screening examination, as
required pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1395dd, that is within the capability of the
emergency department of a hospital, or an emergency facility or provider
subject to equivalent federal or state emergency medical screening and sta-
bilization obligations, including ancillary services routinely available
to the emergency department or emergency facility or provider to evalu-
ate that emergency medical condition, and further medical examination and
treatment that are within the capabilities of the staff and facilities
available at the hospital or emergency facility, as are required pursuant to
42 U.S.C. 1395dd to stabilize the patient.
(4)(a) "Freestanding emergency room" means any facility that:
(i) Is not designated as a critical access hospital under federal
law;
(ii) Is physically separate and distinct from the main campus of a
general acute care hospital;
(iii) Principally provides unscheduled emergency medical ser-
vices to the general public on a twenty-four (24) hour basis,
including emergency physician services, diagnostic imaging,
laboratory services, and short-term observation regardless of
whether inpatient beds are maintained;
(iv) Operates or holds itself out as a freestanding emergency de-
partment, micro-hospital, specialty hospital, or hospital outpa-
tient department;
(v) Submits claims for emergency or other medical services to
state-regulated health benefit plans; and
(vi) Operates generally under an out-of-network reimbursement
strategy and participates directly or indirectly in the federal
independent dispute resolution process, whether in its own name or
through any affiliated entity, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111.
(b) The term "freestanding emergency room" does not include:
(i) A general acute care hospital operated as part of a multi-cam-
pus Idaho hospital system licensed pursuant to chapter 13, title
39, Idaho Code;
(ii) Critical access hospitals; and
(iii) A physician-owned, nonemergency surgery center that does
not advertise or hold itself out as an emergency department and
does not provide twenty-four (24) hour emergency medical ser-
vices.
(c) For purposes of this section, ownership structure, federal program
participation, management arrangements, or physician staffing models
shall not affect whether a facility is deemed a freestanding emergency
room if the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection are otherwise
satisfied.
(5) "In-network provider" or "in-network facility" means a provider or
facility that is contracted with a health benefit plan or its contractor or
subcontractor to provide health care services or emergency health care ser-
vices to covered persons for reimbursement by the health benefit plan at a
contracted rate as payment in full for the health care services, including
applicable cost-sharing obligations.


(6) "Out-of-network provider" or "out-of-network facility" means a
provider or facility that is not contracted with a health benefit plan or
its contractor or subcontractor to provide health care services to covered
persons. The term includes any affiliate, subsidiary, management company,
staffing entity, billing entity, or other related entity that submits or at-
tempts to submit a claim for payment on behalf of, or in connection with ser-
vices furnished by, an out-of-network provider or out-of-network facility.
(7) "Stabilize," with respect to an emergency medical condition, has
the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. 1395dd(e)(3).
(8) "Covered benefits," "covered person," "facility," "health bene-
fit plan," "health care provider" or "provider," "health care services,"
and "health carrier" shall have the same meanings as provided in section
41-5903, Idaho Code.
41-6704. BILLING BY OUT-OF-NETWORK PROVIDERS FOR EMERGENCY SER-
VICES. (1) An out-of-network freestanding emergency room that provides
emergency services to a covered person shall accept as payment in full the
health benefit plan's allowed amount for in-network providers of the same
specialty or type for the same covered emergency service performed at an
in-network facility in the same geographic area of the state of Idaho, re-
gardless of the billing entity, modifier usage, unbundling, rebundling, or
use of affiliated third-party entities. The out-of-network freestanding
emergency room or physicians and their staff working there shall not bill
or seek reimbursement for amounts in excess of the allowed amount from the
covered person who received emergency services.
(2) In calculating the covered person's cost-sharing responsibility
for amounts described in subsection (1) of this section, the health benefit
plan shall apply its in-network benefit design.
(3) The covered person's health benefit plan shall pay directly to the
provider the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section, less any
applicable cost-sharing responsibility of the covered person, without re-
gard to any assignment of benefits, consent form, financial responsibility
acknowledgement, or other agreement or instrument executed by the covered
person.
(4) Any provision in a consent form or other agreement between a
provider and a covered person that purports to permit an out-of-network
provider to bill or seek reimbursement for covered emergency services in
amounts in excess of the amounts permitted pursuant to this chapter, in-
cluding any waiver of balance billing protections, assignment of benefits,
financial responsibility acknowledgement, or similar provision, is void and
unenforceable.
(5)(a) If an out-of-network freestanding emergency room furnishing
emergency services is not enrolled as a participating provider in the
medicare, medicaid, or TRICARE programs, the provider or facility shall
provide a clear and conspicuous disclosure to a covered person who is
enrolled in such a program that the provider or facility does not par-
ticipate in the applicable program and that the covered person may be
personally responsible for payment of some or all charges for services
furnished.


(b) The disclosure required by this subsection shall be made as soon
as practicable after completion of the medical screening examination
required pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1395dd, and only when the covered per-
son is conscious, oriented, and capable of receiving such information,
and when providing the disclosure will not interfere with the provision
of emergency services or stabilization of an emergency medical condi-
tion. The disclosure shall be communicated in plain language that is
understandable to a reasonable person and may be provided orally or in
writing. Failure to provide the disclosure required by this subsection
shall constitute a violation of the provisions of this chapter.
(6) Failure to provide the disclosure required pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that the cov-
ered person was not informed of the freestanding emergency room's nonpartic-
ipation in medicare, medicaid, or TRICARE. In the absence of contemporaneous
documentation demonstrating compliance with subsection (5) of this section,
the freestanding emergency room shall be prohibited from billing, collect-
ing, or seeking reimbursement from the covered person for any charges asso-
ciated with the emergency services furnished. Any bill, invoice, collection
action, or attempt to obtain payment from a covered person in violation of
this subsection shall be void and unenforceable as a matter of law, and no
payment shall be owed by the covered person.
41-6705. SELF-FUNDED PLAN PARTICIPATION. (1) The provisions of this
chapter shall apply to a self-funded health plan, including a self-funded
group health plan governed by the provisions of 29 U.S.C. 1001 et seq., only
if the plan elects to participate in the provisions of this chapter. To elect
to participate in the provisions of this chapter, the plan shall provide no-
tice, on an annual basis, to the director of the department of insurance, in a
manner prescribed by the director, attesting to the plan's participation in
and agreement to be bound by the provisions of this chapter. An election made
pursuant to this section shall apply for the entire plan year for which no-
tice is provided.
(2) At least once annually, the director shall post on the department of
insurance website a list of the self-funded plans that have elected to par-
ticipate in the provisions of this chapter. An entity administering a plan
that elects to participate in the provisions of this chapter shall comply
with the provisions of this chapter but shall not be considered a carrier
or health benefit plan subject to the jurisdiction of the director solely by
virtue of such election.
41-6706. ENFORCEMENT. (1) Any freestanding emergency room or health
benefit plan that violates the provisions of this chapter shall be liable
to pay the reasonable attorney's fees and costs that the covered person or
health plan incurs to challenge the provider's or health benefit plan's ac-
tions.
(2) Any billing by an out-of-network freestanding emergency room or any
affiliated, related, or billing entity acting on its behalf to the covered
person in violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be void and unen-
forceable.


(3) An out-of-network freestanding emergency room shall be liable to a
covered person for reasonable attorney's fees and costs to defend against a
provider's attempts to collect amounts in excess of the amount for which the
covered person is personally responsible pursuant to this chapter.
(4) Upon receipt of written request from an out-of-network freestand-
ing emergency room, covered person, or health benefit plan, the director of
the department of insurance is authorized to inquire of the patient's health
benefit plan to verify whether the amount paid to the provider is consistent
with the provisions of this chapter.
(5) Each attempt to bill or collect amounts in violation of the provi-
sions of this chapter shall constitute a separate violation.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.